Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions; Additions to and Deletions from State Highway System, 1954-1971
§§ 65-3-5 through 65-3-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000).

§65-3-5. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 298, §§ 1-3 (¶¶ 1-3); Laws, 1956, chs. 316, 317, 319; Laws, 1958, chs. 384, 386, 389, 408; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess. ch. 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 462; Laws, 1966, ch. 517; Laws, 1968, chs. 461, 462, § 1; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess., ch. 42; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 9; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-7. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.6; Laws, 1956, ch. 311, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1958, chs. 380, 383, 420, § 1, 421, § 1, 423; Laws, 1960, ch. 364, § 5; Laws, 1962, chs. 421, 422, 425, 432; Laws, 1966, chs. 510, § 1, 516; Laws, 1968, chs. 457, 459, 461, 465; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 41; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 10; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-9. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.65; Laws, 1955, Ex. Sess. chs. 70-72, 75-79, 81-90; Laws, 1958, ch. 381; Laws, 1962, ch. 442; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 11; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-11. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.66; Laws, 1958, chs. 387, §§ 1-3, 390-393, §§ 1-3, 395-397, §§ 1-3, 399, §§ 1-4, 400, §§ 1-3, 402-407, §§ 1-3, 410, §§ 1-3, 412-419, §§ 1-3, 424-428, §§ 1-3, 430, §§ 1-3, 431, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1959, Ex. Sess. ch. 32; Laws, 1960, ch. 364, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 463; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 12; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-13. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.67; Laws, 1960, ch. 364, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1962, chs. 420, § 1, 440; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess. ch. 36. Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 13; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-15. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.68; Laws, 1962, chs. 420-422, 425, 426, 428, 429, §§ 1-4, 431, 433, §§ 1-4, 434, 435, §§ 1-4, 436, 437, 438, §§ 1-4, 439, 442, 443, §§ 1-4, 444, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1966, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 515; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 14; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-17. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.69; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess. ch. 24; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. chs. 17, 18; Laws, 1964, chs. 461, 462, 463, 464, 465; Laws, 1966, ch. 507, § 1; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 40; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 15; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-19. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.691; Laws, 1966, chs. 487, §§ 1-4, 502, §§ 1, 2, 503, § 1, 504, § 1, 508, § 1, 510, § 1, 511, § 1, 512, §§ 1, 2, 513, § 1, 514, § 1, 515, § 1, 517, §§ 1, 2, 518, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess. chs. 35, 36, 37, 39; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 16; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-21. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.692; Laws, 1968, chs. 455, 456, 457, 458, 459, 460, 461, 463, 464, 465]

§65-3-23. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.69,3; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. chs. 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47; Laws, 1970, chs. 431-436; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 17; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-25. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.694; Laws, 1971, ch. 425, §§ 1, 2, and 3; Repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, 1985, ch. 537, § 18; reenacted without change, 1987, ch. 510, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§65-3-27. [Codes, 1942, § 8021.7; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 35]

§ 65-3-8.
No citation for violation of revised allowable weight limits for bridges until twenty-four hours after posting of sign indicating revised limits.

When the Mississippi Department of Transportation designates a bridge as failing to meet the design, standard, sufficiency rating or any other criteria required for allowing certain weight limits on that specific bridge and revises the allowable weight limits for that bridge, no citation may be issued to the driver of a vehicle for violations of the revised weight limits for that bridge until twenty-four (24) hours have elapsed from the completion of the installation of a sign posted on or near the bridge indicating that the allowable weight limits applicable to that bridge have been revised.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 554, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§§ 65-3-29 through 65-3-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 464, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§65-3-29. [Codes, 1942, § 8022-01; Laws, 1968, ch. 453, § 1]

§65-3-31. [Codes, 1942, § 8022-02; Laws, 1968, ch. 453, § 2]

§ 65-3-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 11, eff from and after passage (May 20, 2000).

[Codes, 1942, § 8022-03; Laws, 1968, ch. 453, § 3; Laws, 1972, ch. 309; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1987]

§ 65-3-34.
Additional lanes along Mississippi Highway 552 in Jefferson and Claiborne Counties.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall construct and reconstruct to department design standards four (4) lanes for traffic on and along Mississippi Highway 552 in Jefferson and Claiborne Counties beginning at its intersection with United States Highway 61 in Jefferson County and extending to Alcorn State University in Claiborne County. The Transportation Department shall also construct an interchange at the intersection of newly constructed Mississippi Highway 552 and United States Highway 61. Such highway and interchange shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance and, together with the highways designated in Sections 65-3-3 and 65-3-5, and all other laws adding links to the state designated highway system, are declared to be the State Highway System of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 65-3-35.
Certain highways designated as scenic route.

The following links of highways located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as a scenic route:

U.S. Highway 61 at Woodville, in Wilkinson County, Mississippi, thence to Natchez, in Adams County, thence to Fayette, in Jefferson County, thence to Port Gibson, in Claiborne County, thence across the new Highway 61 Bridge, spanning Bayou Pierre, which shall be known and is hereby designated as the Irwin Russell Memorial Bridge, and which shall be so marked and designated, and from thence to Vicksburg, in Warren County, Mississippi, and running to Redwood, in Warren County, Mississippi; Mississippi Highway No. 3 beginning at point of intersection with U.S. Highway 61, north of Redwood, and running north to Yazoo City, in Yazoo County, Mississippi; U.S. Highway 49-E beginning at Yazoo City in Yazoo County, Mississippi, running north to Greenwood in Leflore County, Mississippi; Mississippi Highway No. 7 beginning at a point at or near Greenwood where same intersects U.S. Highway 49-E, running in a northeasterly direction to Grenada, in Grenada County, Mississippi; Mississippi Highway No. 7, where same intersects U.S. Highway No. 51 north of Grenada, and running north through Water Valley, in Yalobusha County, Oxford, in Lafayette County, Holly Springs, in Marshall County, and north from Holly Springs to the Tennessee-state line north of the community of Slayden, in Marshall County, Mississippi, to intersect the Austin Peay Memorial Highway in the State of Tennessee; U.S. Highway 90 from Mississippi Highway No. 607 in Hancock County, Mississippi, to the Alabama state line; the portion of Mississippi Highway No. 607 beginning at a point of intersection with Interstate Highway 10 and running southeasterly to the point of intersection with U.S. Highway 90.

All links of highway designated herein not now a part of the state system of highways in Mississippi are hereby designated and declared to be on the secondary group of highways in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8024-03; Laws, 1948, ch. 342, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 374; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 65-3-36.
Additional designation of highways as scenic route.

The following segments of highways located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as a scenic route:

Mississippi Highway 7 beginning at point of intersection with Interstate 55, running east to the intersection with Mississippi Highway 332, thence southerly along the route of the Grenada Dam then to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 8, thence running west along the route of Mississippi Highway 8 to its intersection with Interstate 55.

The State Highway Department may plan and erect suitable signs and markers along such route and along the interstate approaches to the area. Such signs shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism, recreation and camping in the area.

The State Highway Department may establish and maintain rest and observation areas along the designated route and may invite the participation of and cooperate with any state, county or municipal agency to assist in the promotion and development of the scenic route hereinabove designated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 421 §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1974).

§ 65-3-37.
Markers designating Chickasa-Leaf Barn Quilt Trail authorized.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized and directed to allow for the erection of two (2) markers designating the Chickasa-Leaf Barn Quilt Trail, with one (1) at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 98 and Mississippi Highway 57 North, which is outside and east of the McLain corporate limits, and another at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 57 South and Highway 63 South, which is within the Leakesville corporate limits.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall not be responsible for erecting or maintaining the markers described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws of 2015, ch. 442, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2015).

§ 65-3-37.1.
Markers recognizing the Military Order of the Purple Heart authorized.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized and directed to allow for the erection of markers recognizing the Military Order of the Purple Heart at the entrances of state highways in the counties of Mississippi, subject to the limitation that only four (4) markers be authorized for erection per county.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall not be responsible for purchasing, erecting or maintaining the markers described in subsection (1) of this section, or any other material related to the erection of such markers. However, the Mississippi Transportation Commission may promulgate rules and regulations in regard to marker placement at the designated entrances. Marker size shall not exceed two (2) feet by two (2) feet. Local governing authorities may assist in the erection of the markers, but shall not be required to do so.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 442, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2015).